Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 10

INSURANCE
CONTRACTS GENERALLY

PART I.
READABILITY OF INSURANCE CONTRACTS

§431:10-101 Scope; effective dates.
This part shall apply to all contracts filed after June 30, 1983. No contract
shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this State after June 30, 1984,
unless the contract meets the requirements of this part or has been approved by
the commissioner. Any contract approved or permitted to be issued prior to
July 1, 1984, is exempt from refiling for approval and may continue to be lawfully
delivered or issued for delivery in this State provided a list of such
contracts identified by contract number and accompanied by a signed certificate
in the manner prescribed by section 431:10-107 is filed with the commissioner.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next